Missouri, session 2026, HB2726.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 376.2048, to read as follows:
376.2048. 1. For purposes of this section, the terms "enrollee", "health care
provider", "health carrier", and "health benefit plan" shall have the same meanings
given to the terms in section 376.1350.
2. A health carrier or health benefit plan that offers or issues health benefit
plans that are delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in this state on or
after January 1, 2027, shall not require an enrollee who has received a prescription from
his or her health care provider for a particular drug covered by the health benefit plan
to take a different drug deemed more appropriate for the enrollee's condition by the
health carrier or health benefit plan in order to receive coverage under the health
benefit plan unless the enrollee's health care provider gives written approval for the
change in drugs and the change is in the interest of the enrollee's health.
3. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the substitution of an
interchangeable biological product as described in section 338.085.
4. The provisions of this section shall not apply to coverage of a prescription
drug restricted via a step therapy protocol as described in section 376.2034.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.